Utah statutes.
62A-4a-209.   Emergency placement.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Nonrelative" means an individual, other than a noncustodial parent or a
relative.
(b)  "Relative" is as defined in Subsection 78A-6-307(1)(b).
(2)  The division may use an emergency placement under Subsection 62A-
4a-202.1(4)(b)(ii) when:
(a)  the case worker has made the determination that:
(i)  the child's home is unsafe;
(ii)  removal is necessary under the provisions of Section 62A-4a-202.1; and
(iii)  the child's custodial parent or guardian will agree to not remove the
child from the home of the person that serves as the placement and not have
any contact with the child until after the shelter hearing required by Section
78A-6-306;
(b)  a person, with preference being given in accordance with Subsection (4),
can be identified who has the ability and is willing to provide care for the
child who would otherwise be placed in shelter care, including:
(i)  taking the child to medical, mental health, dental, and educational
appointments at the request of the division; and
(ii)  making the child available to division services and the guardian ad
litem; and
(c)  the person described in Subsection (2)(b) agrees to care for the child on
an emergency basis under the following conditions:
(i)  the person meets the criteria for an emergency placement under Subsection
(3);
(ii)  the person agrees to not allow the custodial parent or guardian to have
any contact with the child until after the shelter hearing unless authorized
by the division in writing;
(iii)  the person agrees to contact law enforcement and the division if the
custodial parent or guardian attempts to make unauthorized contact with the
child;
(iv)  the person agrees to allow the division and the child's guardian ad
litem to have access to the child;
(v)  the person has been informed and understands that the division may
continue to search for other possible placements for long-term care, if
needed;
(vi)  the person is willing to assist the custodial parent or guardian in
reunification efforts at the request of the division, and to follow all court
orders; and
(vii)  the child is comfortable with the person.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), before the division
places a child in an emergency placement, the division:
(a)  may request the name of a reference and may contact the reference to
determine the answer to the following questions:
(i)  would the person identified as a reference place a child in the home of
the emergency placement; and
(ii)  are there any other relatives or friends to consider as a possible
emergency or long-term placement for the child;
(b)  shall have the custodial parent or guardian sign an emergency placement
agreement form during the investigation;
(c) (i) if the emergency placement will be with a relative of the child, shall
comply with the background check provisions described in Subsection (7); or
(ii)  if the emergency placement will be with a person other than a
noncustodial parent or a relative, shall comply with the criminal background
check provisions described in Section 78A-6-308 for adults living in the
household where the child will be placed;
(d)  shall complete a limited home inspection of the home where the emergency
placement is made; and
(e)  shall have the emergency placement approved by a family service
specialist.
(4) (a)  The following order of preference shall be applied when determining
the person with whom a child will be placed in an emergency placement
described in this section, provided that the person is willing, and has the
ability, to care for the child:
(i)  a noncustodial parent of the child in accordance with Section 78A-6-307;
(ii)  a relative of the child;
(iii)  subject to Subsection (4)(b), a friend designated by the custodial
parent or guardian of the child, if the friend is a licensed foster parent;
and
(iv)  a shelter facility, former foster placement, or other foster placement
designated by the division.
(b)  Unless the division agrees otherwise, the custodial parent or guardian
described in Subsection (4)(a)(iii) may only designate one friend as a
potential emergency placement.
(5) (a)  The division may, pending the outcome of the investigation described
in Subsections (5)(b) and (c), place a child in emergency placement with the
child's noncustodial parent if, based on a limited investigation, prior to
making the emergency placement, the division:
(i)  determines that the noncustodial parent has regular, unsupervised
visitation with the child that is not prohibited by law or court order;
(ii)  determines that there is not reason to believe that the child's health
or safety will be endangered during the emergency placement; and
(iii)  has the custodial parent or guardian sign an emergency placement
agreement.
(b)  Either before or after making an emergency placement with the
noncustodial parent of the child, the division may conduct the investigation
described in Subsection (3)(a) in relation to the noncustodial parent.
(c)  Before, or within one day, excluding weekends and holidays, after a child
is placed in an emergency placement with the noncustodial parent of the child,
the division shall conduct a limited:
(i)  background check of the noncustodial parent, pursuant to Subsection (7);
and
(ii)  inspection of the home where the emergency placement is made.
(6)  After an emergency placement, the division caseworker must:
(a)  respond to the emergency placement's calls within one hour if the
custodial parents or guardians attempt to make unauthorized contact with the
child or attempt to remove the child;
(b)  complete all removal paperwork, including the notice provided to the
custodial parents and guardians under Section 78A-6-306;
(c)  contact the attorney general to schedule a shelter hearing;
(d)  complete the placement procedures required in Section 78A-6-307; and
(e)  continue to search for other relatives as a possible long-term placement,
if needed.
(7) (a)  The background check described in Subsection (3)(c)(i) shall include:
(i)  completion of a nonfingerprint-based, Utah Bureau of Criminal
Identification background check; and
(ii)  a completed search of the Management Information System described in
Section 62A-4a-1003.
(b)  The division shall determine whether a person passes the background check
described in this Subsection (7) pursuant to the provisions of Subsections
62A-2-120(2), (3), and (8).
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(b), the division may not place a child
with an individual who is prohibited by court order from having access to that
child.
